Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,160
Medical treatment protocols.

All medical treatment protocols developed, approved, and implemented by the department shall be based upon a community standard of health care. When applicable, these medical treatment protocols shall emphasize the need to maintain the continuity of any previously prescribed drugs, devices, or biologicals and treatment regimens that inmates are subject to when they enter the custody of the department. The medical director shall establish a mechanism for the periodic systematic review of all existing medical treatment protocols. All deviations from the approved medical treatment protocols shall be thoroughly documented by the department's health care staff and shall be systematically reviewed by the department's peer review and quality assurance panel.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 8.